Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-902
Utilities; contracts for service; transmission lines authorized.

Any city of the second class or village is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into a contract with any person or corporation either within or without the corporate limits of such city or village for the furnishing of electricity, power, steam or other product to such city or village or to any electric, power, steam or other system or plant owned and operated by such city or village. Such city of the second class or village is hereby authorized and empowered for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 17-901 to 17-904, to have a right-of-way for and to maintain transmission lines upon, within and across any of the public highways of this state as is provided by law for persons, firms, associations and corporations engaged in generating and transmitting electric current within this state.

Laws 1919, c. 49, § 1, p. 142;

C.S.1922, § 4317;

C.S.1929, § 17-508;

R.S.1943, § 17-902.